Idaho statutes. Title 47 MINES AND MINING
Chapter 3
OIL AND GAS WELLS — GEOLOGIC INFORMATION,
AND PREVENTION OF WASTE

Sec.

§ 47-301 — 47-305. Geological information — Log drilling operations — Certified copy of log — Filing — Sample of minerals and formations penetrated — Information and reports confidential — Application for forms and containers. [Repealed.]

§ 47-306. Preservation and use of samples and records — Reports of determinations and identifications.

The Idaho geological survey shall preserve any samples or records deposited with it pertaining to mineral, oil or gas resources, exploration or production on lands within the state. The Idaho geological survey may use such samples or records to assist with mineral and petroleum assessments and characterization of geologic resources as part of its mission and directive to determine the geology, hydrogeology, geologic hazards, and mineral, oil and gas resources of the state. On request, the Idaho geological survey shall supply to the owner or owners of the samples or records a report of any such determinations and identifications specific to the samples or records provided by the owner or owners of the samples or records.

§ 47-307. Use of information.

The Idaho geological survey is hereby authorized to utilize in its study of regional geology, mineral deposits, industrial minerals and aggregates, oil and gas resources, and groundwater resources, in its dissemination of geological and mineral data, and in its publication of reports and maps on the geology and mineral resources of the state, any information derived from samples and records deposited with it. The Idaho geological survey shall not disclose any record, or any information contained therein, if the record or information is exempt from disclosure under the Idaho public records act, chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code, or is subject to a confidentiality agreement between the Idaho geological survey and the owner or owners of the records or information. Should a confidentiality or data-sharing agreement exist, the terms of that agreement shall control any disclosure by the Idaho geological survey. For information that becomes publicly available or that is not exempt from disclosure under the Idaho public records act, the existence of a confidentiality or data-sharing agreement will not extend the period of confidentiality beyond that available under the Idaho public records act. Subject to any confidentiality or data-sharing agreement, the Idaho geological survey is authorized to share such records or information obtained under section 47-306, Idaho Code, or information derived therefrom, with the Idaho oil and gas conservation commission and the Idaho department of lands, in furtherance of the respective authorized functions of the commission and the Idaho department of lands. The sharing of information between the Idaho geological survey, the oil and gas conservation commission and the Idaho department of lands shall not render the shared information subject to disclosure to other persons under the Idaho public records act.

§ 47-308. Conditions for publication of information. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 1963, ch. 148, § 1.

§ 47-309. Title.

This act may be cited as the Oil and Gas Conservation Act.

§ 47-310. Definitions.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the terms defined in this section shall have the following meaning when used in this act. The use of the plural includes the singular, and the use of the singular includes the plural.

“Commission” means the oil and gas conservation commission.

“Confidential well status” refers to a well for which the operator has applied and received confidential status from the commission pursuant to section 47-327, Idaho Code. Information about a confidential well is exempt from disclosure as to the public, but not with regard to the commission or other state authority.

“Condensate” means the liquid produced by the condensation of a vapor or gas either after it leaves the reservoir or while still in the reservoir.

“Correlative rights” means the opportunity of each owner in a pool to produce his just and equitable share of oil and gas in a pool without waste.

“Department” means the Idaho department of lands.

“End purchaser” means a third-party, arms-length purchaser of oil, gas or condensate that is ready for refining or other use, or a third-party, arms-length purchaser of other fluid or gaseous hydrocarbons that have been separated in a processing facility.

“Exploration” means activities related to the various geological and geophysical methods used to detect and determine the existence and extent of hydrocarbon deposits. The activities related to the search for oil and gas include without limitation aerial, geological and geophysical surveys and studies, seismic work, core drilling and the drilling of test wells.

“Field” means the general area underlaid by one (1) or more pools.

“Gas” means natural gas, which is a mixture of hydrocarbons and varying quantities of non-hydrocarbons that exist either in the gaseous phase or in solution with crude oil in natural underground reservoirs.

“Gathering facility” means a facility that receives gathering lines from wells, commingles the produced materials, and then sends those materials to a processing facility.

“Market value” means the price at the time of sale, in cash or on terms reasonably equivalent to cash, for which the oil and gas should bring in a competitive and open market under all conditions requisite to a fair sale, the buyer and seller each acting prudently and knowledgeably, and assuming the price is not affected by undue stimulus from either party. The costs of marketing, transporting and processing oil and gas produced shall be borne entirely by the producer, and such cost shall not reduce the severance tax directly or indirectly.

“MCF” means one thousand cubic feet of gas.

“Mineral interest” means the right to explore, drill or produce oil and gas lying beneath the surface of property.

“Natural gas liquids” means hydrocarbons that are gaseous in the reservoir, but will separate out in liquid form at the pressures and temperatures at which separators normally operate. The liquids consist of varying proportions of butane, propane, pentane and heavier fractions, with little or no methane or ethane.

“Natural gas plant liquids” means hydrocarbon compounds in raw gas that are separated as liquids at gas processing plants, fractionating plants, and cycling plants. Natural gas plant liquids obtained include ethane, liquefied petroleum gases (propane and the butanes), and pentanes plus any heavier hydrocarbon compounds. Component products may be fractionated or mixed.
(16) “Occupied structure” means a building with walls and a roof within which individuals live or customarily work.

“Occupied structure” means a building with walls and a roof within which individuals live or customarily work.

“Oil” means and includes crude petroleum oil and other hydrocarbons, regardless of gravity, that are produced at the wellhead in liquid form and the liquid hydrocarbons known as distillate or condensate recovered or extracted from gas.

“Oil and gas” means oil or gas or both. “Oil and gas” refers not only to oil and gas in combination with each other but also generally to oil, gas, casinghead gas, casinghead gasoline, gas-distillate or other hydrocarbons, or any combination or combinations thereof, which may be found in or produced from a common source or supply of oil, oil and gas, or gas-distillate.

“Oil and gas administrator” means the division administrator for oil and gas conservation within the department of lands, as established under section 58-104A, Idaho Code.

“Oil and gas facility” means equipment or improvements used or installed at an oil and gas location for the exploration, production, withdrawal, gathering, treatment or processing of oil or natural gas.

“Oil and gas operations” means operations to explore for, develop or produce oil and gas.

“Operator” means any duly authorized person who is in charge of the development of a lease, pool, or spacing or unitized area, or the operation of a producing well.

“Owner” means the person who has the right to drill into and produce from a pool and to appropriate the oil and gas that he produces therefrom, either for himself or for himself and others.

“Person” means any natural person, corporation, association, partnership, receiver, trustee, executor, administrator, guardian, fiduciary or other representatives of any kind, and includes any government or any political subdivision of any agency thereof. The masculine gender, in referring to a person, includes the feminine and the neuter genders.

“Pool” means an underground reservoir containing a common accumulation of oil and gas. Each zone of a structure that is completely separated from any other zone in the same structure is a pool.

“Processing facility” means a facility that refines gas and liquid hydrocarbons.

“Producer” means the owner of a well or wells capable of producing oil and gas.

“Reservoir” means a subsurface volume of porous and permeable rock in which oil and gas may have accumulated.

“Royalty owner” means any owner of an interest in an oil and gas lease that entitles him to share in the production of the oil and gas under the lease.

“Tract” means an expanse of land representing the surface expression of the underlying mineral estate that includes oil and gas rights. A tract:

May be identified by its public land survey system of rectangular surveys that subdivides and describes land in the United States in the public domain and is regulated by the United States department of the interior, bureau of land management;

Is of no particular size;

May be irregular in form;

Is contiguous;

May lie in more than one (1) township or one (1) section;

May have a boundary defined entirely or in part by natural monuments such as streams, divides or straight lines connecting prominent features of topography; and
(g) May be combined with other tracts to form a lease.

“Uncommitted owner” means one who is not leased or otherwise contractually obligated to the operator.

“Waste” as applied to gas shall include the escape, blowing or releasing, directly or indirectly, into the open air of gas from wells productive of gas only, or gas in an excessive or unreasonable amount from wells producing oil or both oil and gas; and the production of gas in quantities or in such manner as will unreasonably reduce reservoir pressure or unreasonably diminish the quantity of oil and gas that might ultimately be produced; excepting gas that is reasonably necessary in the drilling, completing and testing of wells and in furnishing power for the production of wells.

“Waste” as applied to oil means and includes underground waste; inefficient, excessive or improper use or dissipation of reservoir energy, including gas energy and water drive; surface waste, open-pit storage and waste incident to the production of oil in excess of the producer’s above-ground storage facilities and lease and contractual requirements, but excluding storage (other than open-pit storage) reasonably necessary for building up and maintaining crude stocks and products thereof for consumption, use and sale; the locating, drilling, equipping, operating or producing of any well in a manner that causes, or tends to cause, reduction of the quantity of oil and gas ultimately recoverable from a pool under prudent and proper operations.

“Workover” means an operation in which a well is reentered for the purpose of maintaining or repairing it.

§ 47-311. Public interest.

It is declared to be in the public interest to foster, encourage and promote the development, production and utilization of natural resources of oil and gas in the state of Idaho in such a manner as will prevent waste; to provide for uniformity and consistency in the regulation of the production of oil and gas throughout the state of Idaho; to authorize and to provide for the operations and development of oil and gas properties in such a manner that a greater ultimate recovery of oil and gas may be obtained and that the correlative rights of all owners be fully protected; to encourage, authorize and provide for voluntary agreements for cycling, recycling, pressure maintenance and secondary recovery operations in order that the greatest possible economic recovery of oil and gas may be obtained within the state to the end that the land owners, the royalty owners, the producers and the general public may realize and enjoy the greatest possible good from these vital natural resources.

§ 47-312. Act not construed to restrict production — Waste prohibited.

It is not the intent or purpose of this law to require the proration or distribution or the production of oil and gas among the fields of Idaho on the basis of market demand. This act shall never be construed to require, permit, or authorize the commission or any court to make, enter, or enforce any order, rule, regulation or judgment requiring restriction of production due to market demand of any pool or of any well (except as provided in section 47-315, Idaho Code, hereof) to an amount less than the well or pool can produce without waste in accordance with sound engineering practices. The waste of oil and gas or either of them as defined in this chapter is hereby prohibited.

§ 47-313. Lands subject to this act.

This act shall apply to all lands located in the state, however owned, including any lands owned or administered by any government or any agency or political subdivision thereof, including lands of the United States, or lands subject to the jurisdiction of the United States over which the state of Idaho has police power, except to the degree that it is inharmonious with the uses, activities or regulations of the United States, and furthermore, the same shall apply to any lands committed to a unit agreement approved by the secretary of the interior or his duly authorized representative, except that the commission may, with respect to such unit agreement, suspend the application of this act or any part of this act so long as the conservation of oil and gas and the prevention of waste as in this act provided is accomplished under such unit agreements, but such suspension shall not relieve any operator from making such reports as may be required by the commission with respect to operations under any such unit agreement.

§ 47-314. Oil and gas conservation commission created — Powers — Limit on local restrictions — Attorney general.

There is hereby created an oil and gas conservation commission of the state of Idaho within the department of lands. The commission shall consist of the director of the department of lands, a county commissioner as described in this section, and three (3) members appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate.

The county commissioner shall be from a county where oil and gas are being produced or have been produced within the last ten (10) years and shall be elected by a majority of the county commissioners from such producing counties. The county commissioner shall serve a four (4) year term. A vacancy shall be filled by election for the unexpired term in the same manner provided for election to a full term.

The members appointed by the governor shall serve at the pleasure of the governor and shall have a college degree in geosciences or engineering and at least ten (10) years of experience in the oil and gas industry. The governor shall appoint the three (3) technical expert members: one (1) member for a term of four (4) years, one (1) member for a term of three (3) years, and one (1) member for a term of two (2) years. Thereafter, the term of office of each appointed member of the commission shall be four (4) years. A vacancy shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term in the same manner provided for an appointment to the full term.

On July 1, 2017, the terms of the existing members of the commission appointed under this section shall terminate, with the sole exception that such commission shall decide any administrative actions filed prior to July 1, 2017. Actions filed on and after July 1, 2017, shall be decided by the new commission established under this section.

The commission shall annually elect a chairman and a vice chairman from their membership. Such officers shall hold their respective offices until their successors are elected. If a vacancy occurs in either office, the commission shall elect a member to fill such office for the remainder of the term.

The commission shall meet at least annually and thereafter on dates set by the commission. A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum.

The members of the commission appointed by the governor or selected by the county commissioners shall be compensated as provided in section 59-509(n), Idaho Code.

The oil and gas administrator of the department of lands shall be the secretary for the commission.

The department of lands shall have the power to exercise, under the general control and supervision of the commission, all of the rights, powers and duties vested by law in the commission, except those provided in sections 47-328 and 47-329(3), Idaho Code.

The commission shall have and is hereby given jurisdiction and authority over all persons and property, public and private, necessary to enforce the provisions of this act, and shall have power and authority to make and enforce rules, regulations and orders, and do whatever may reasonably be necessary to carry out the provisions of this act. Any delegation of authority to any other state officer, board or commission to administer any and all other laws of this state relating to the conservation of oil and gas is hereby rescinded and withdrawn and such authority is hereby unqualifiedly conferred upon the commission, as herein provided. The commission shall follow procedures on applications as provided in section 47-328, Idaho Code, except as provided in sections 47-316(1)(a) and 47-329(3), Idaho Code.
(9) It is the intent of the legislature to occupy the field of the regulation of oil and gas exploration and production with the limited exception of the exercise of planning and zoning authority granted cities and counties pursuant to chapter 65, title 67, Idaho Code.

It is the intent of the legislature to occupy the field of the regulation of oil and gas exploration and production with the limited exception of the exercise of planning and zoning authority granted cities and counties pursuant to chapter 65, title 67, Idaho Code.

To implement the purpose of the oil and gas conservation act, and to advance the public interest in the orderly development of the state’s oil and gas resources, while at the same time recognizing the responsibility of local governments to protect the public health, safety and welfare, it is herein provided that:

The commission will notify the respective city or county with jurisdiction upon receipt of an application and will remit, electronically, a copy of all application materials.

No ordinance, resolution, requirement or standard of a city, county or political subdivision, except a state agency with authority, shall actually or operationally prohibit the extraction of oil and gas; provided however, that extraction may be subject to reasonable local ordinance provisions, not repugnant to law, which protect public health, public safety, public order or which prevent harm to public infrastructure or degradation of the value, use and enjoyment of private property. Any ordinance regulating extraction enacted pursuant to chapter 65, title 67, Idaho Code, shall provide for administrative permitting under conditions established by ordinance, not to exceed twenty-one (21) days, unless extended by agreement of the parties or upon good cause shown.

No ordinance, resolution, requirement or standard of a city, county or political subdivision, except a state agency with authority, shall actually or operationally prohibit construction or operation of facilities and infrastructure needed for the post-extraction processing and transport of gas and oil. However, such facilities and infrastructure shall be subject to local ordinances, regulations and permitting requirements, not repugnant to law, as provided in chapter 65, title 67, Idaho Code.

The commission may sue and be sued in its administration of this act in any state or federal district court in the state of Idaho having jurisdiction of the parties or of the subject matter.

The attorney general shall act as the legal advisor of the commission and represent the commission in all court proceedings and in all proceedings before it, and in any proceeding to which the commission may be a party before any department of the federal government. The commission may retain additional counsel to assist the attorney general and, for such purpose, may employ any funds available under this act.

§ 47-315. Authority of commission.

The commission is authorized and it is its duty to regulate the exploration for and production of oil and gas, prevent waste of oil and gas and to protect correlative rights, and otherwise to administer and enforce this act. It has jurisdiction over all persons and property necessary for such purposes. In the event of a conflict, the duty to prevent waste is paramount.

The commission and the department shall protect correlative rights by administering the provisions of this chapter in such a manner as to avoid the drilling of unnecessary wells or incurring unnecessary expense, and in a manner that allows all operators and royalty owners a fair and just opportunity for production and the right to recover, receive and enjoy the benefits of oil and gas or equivalent resources, while also protecting the rights of surface owners.

The commission is authorized to make such investigations as it deems proper to determine whether action by the commission in discharging its duties is necessary.

The commission is authorized to appoint, as necessary, committees for the purpose of advising the commission on matters relating to oil and gas.

Without limiting its general authority, the commission shall have the specific authority to require:

Identification of ownership of oil and gas wells, producing leases, tanks, plants, structures, and facilities for the transportation or refining of oil and gas;

The taking and preservation of samples and findings, if taken or analyzed;

The drilling, casing, operation and plugging of wells in such manner as to prevent: (i) the escape of oil and gas out of one (1) pool into another; (ii) the detrimental intrusion of water into an oil and gas pool that is avoidable by efficient operations; (iii) the pollution of fresh water supplies by oil, gas, or saltwater; (iv) blow-outs, cavings, seepages, and fires; and (v) waste as defined in section 47-310, Idaho Code;

The taking of tests of oil and gas wells;

The furnishing of a reasonable performance bond with good and sufficient surety, conditioned upon the performance of the duty to comply with the requirements of this law and the regulations of the commission with respect to the drilling, maintaining, operating and plugging of each well drilled for oil and gas;

That the production from wells be separated into gaseous and liquid hydrocarbons, and that each be measured by means and upon standards that may be prescribed by the commission;

That wells not be operated with inefficient gas-oil or water-oil ratios, and to fix these ratios, and to limit production from wells with inefficient gas-oil or water-oil ratios;

Metering or other measuring of oil, gas, or product;

That every person who produces oil and gas in the state keep and maintain for a period of five (5) years complete and accurate records of the quantities thereof, which records, or certified copies thereof, shall be available for examination by the commission or its agents at all reasonable times within said period, and that every such person file with the commission such reasonable reports as it may prescribe with respect to such oil and gas production; and

The filing of reports or plats with the commission that it may prescribe.
(6) Without limiting its general authority, and without limiting the authority of other state agencies or local government as provided by law, the commission shall have the specific authority to regulate:

(a) The drilling and plugging of wells and the compression or dehydration of produced oil and gas, and all other operations for the production of oil and gas;

(b) The shooting and treatment of wells;

(c) The spacing or locating of wells;

(d) Operations to increase ultimate recovery, such as cycling of gas, the maintenance of pressure, and the introduction of gas, water, or other substances into a producing formation; and

(e) The disposal of produced water and oil field wastes.

(7) The commission is authorized to classify and reclassify pools as oil, gas, or condensate pools, or wells as oil, gas, or condensate wells.

(8) The commission is authorized to make and enforce rules, regulations, and orders reasonably necessary to prevent waste, protect correlative rights, to govern the practice and procedure before the commission, and otherwise to administer this act.

(9) The commission shall require the department to perform the following activities on an annual basis:

(a) Inspect and report on all active well sites and equipment;

(b) Visit and file a report on production and processing facilities; and

(c) Submit an opinion as to any areas of concern, as identified on inspection reports.

§ 47-316. Permit to drill or treat a well — Fees.

It shall be unlawful to commence operations for the drilling or treating of a well for oil and gas without first giving notice to the commission of intention to drill or treat and without first obtaining a permit from the commission under such rules and regulations as may be reasonably prescribed by the commission and by paying to the commission a filing and service fee as provided by this section.

Any request for a permit or authorization as set forth in subsection (3)(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), (m), (n) or (o) of this section shall be made by application to the department of lands, and processed as provided in this section.

The department shall notify the director of the department of water resources regarding applications for permits to drill or treat a well. The director of water resources shall have ten (10) business days from the date of receipt of such notification from the department of lands to recommend conditions he believes necessary to protect freshwater supplies.

Applications submitted under this section, except those listed in subsection (3)(c) and (g) of this section, shall be posted on the department of lands’ website for ten (10) business days for a written comment period.

The department of lands shall approve or deny applications in subsection (3)(a), (b), (c), (d), (f), (g), (m), (n) and (o) of this section in a timely and efficient manner. This time frame does not apply to permits submitted with an application processed under section 47-328, Idaho Code.

The department’s decision made under this section may be appealed to the commission by the applicant pursuant to the procedure in section 47-328(4) through (6), Idaho Code.

Upon issuance of any permit to drill or treat a well, a copy thereof, including any limitations, conditions, controls, rules or regulations attached thereto for the protection of freshwater supplies as required in section 47-315, Idaho Code, shall be forwarded to the director of the department of water resources.

The department shall collect the following fees, which shall be remitted to the state treasurer for deposit in the oil and gas conservation fund and shall be used exclusively to pay the costs and expenses incurred in connection with the administration and enforcement of this chapter:

Application for a permit to drill a well ............................... $2,000

Application to deepen a well ............................... 500

Application to plug and abandon a well, if not completed within one (1) year from issuance of permit to drill a well ............................... 500

Application to treat a well, if separate from an application for a permit to drill a well ............................... 1,000

Application to construct a pit, if separate from an application for a permit to drill a well ............................... 1,500

Application to directionally drill a well, if separate from an application for a permit to drill a well ............................... 1,000

Application for a recompletion, modified blow out prevention standards, using a vacuum for oil or gas recovery, removing casing, or multiple zone completion, if separate from an application for a permit to drill or plug and abandon a well ............................... 1,000

Application for an exceptional well location, if separate from an application for a permit to drill a well ............................... 1,300

Application to change the size, shape or location of a spacing unit
............................... 1,300

Application to establish or amend a fieldwide spacing order ............................... 1,300

Application for an integration order ............................... 1,300

Application for a unitization order ............................... 1,300

Application for a seismic operations permit covering less than twelve (12) miles of a 2-D survey ............................... 800

Application for a seismic operations permit covering between twelve (12) miles and twenty-four (24) miles of a 2-D survey, or up to seventy-two (72) square miles of a 3-D survey ............................... 2,000

Application for a seismic operations permit covering more than twenty-four (24) miles of a 2-D survey, or more than seventy-two (72) square miles of a 3-D survey ............................... 2,500

§ 47-317. Drilling locations.

To prevent or assist in preventing the waste of oil and gas, to avoid drilling unnecessary wells or to protect correlative rights, the department may, on its own motion or on the application of an interested person, and after notice and opportunity for hearing, issue an order establishing drilling units on a statewide basis, or for defined areas within the state, or for oil and gas wells drilled to varying depths.

An order establishing drilling units shall comply with section 47-318(2), Idaho Code.

In the absence of an order by the department establishing drilling or spacing units, or authorizing different well density patterns for particular pools or parts thereof, the following requirements shall apply:

Oil wells. Every well drilled for oil shall be located in the center of a drilling unit consisting of a forty (40) acre governmental quarter-quarter section or lot or tract, or combination of lots and tracts substantially equivalent thereto, with a tolerance of two hundred (200) feet in any direction from the center location.

No oil well shall be drilled less than nine hundred ninety (990) feet from any other well drilling to and capable of producing oil from the same pool; and

No oil well shall be completed in a known pool unless it is located more than nine hundred ninety (990) feet from any other well completed in and capable of producing oil from the same pool.

Vertical gas wells. Every vertical well drilled for gas shall be located in a drilling unit consisting of either a one hundred sixty (160) acre governmental quarter section or lot or tract, or combination of lots and tracts substantially equivalent thereto, or a six hundred forty (640) acre governmental section or lot or tract, or combination of lots or tracts substantially equivalent thereto. A vertical gas well located on a one hundred sixty (160) acre drilling unit shall have a minimum setback of three hundred thirty (330) feet to the exterior boundaries of the quarter section. A vertical gas well located on a six hundred forty (640) acre drilling unit shall have a minimum setback of six hundred sixty (660) feet to the exterior boundaries of the governmental section.

No gas well shall be drilled less than nine hundred ninety (990) feet from any other well drilling to and capable of producing gas from the same pool; and

No gas well shall be completed in a known pool unless it is located more than nine hundred ninety (990) feet from any other well completed in and capable of producing gas from the same pool.

Horizontal wells. Every horizontal well drilled shall be located in a drilling unit consisting of a six hundred forty (640) acre governmental section or lot or tract, or combination of lots or tracts substantially equivalent thereto. No portion of the completed interval of a horizontal lateral shall be closer than six hundred sixty (660) feet to a section boundary or uncommitted tract within a unit. Except for wells in federal exploratory units or in secondary units, the completed interval shall be no closer than one thousand three hundred twenty (1,320) feet to any horizontal well or vertical well completed in the same formation.

Notice. After drilling, testing and completing a well that meets the location requirements in paragraphs (a), (b) or (c) of this subsection, but prior to producing that well, an operator shall provide notice and opportunity for hearing for the proposed drilling unit. In addition to any other notice required by statute or rule, the operator shall provide notice of the proposed drilling unit by certified mail to all uncommitted owners within the proposed drilling unit. The department may authorize drilling units upon application, notice and an opportunity for hearing as provided in section 47-328, Idaho Code. However, prior to establishing a drilling unit for a well that meets the location requirements in paragraph (a), (b) or (c) of this subsection, the department may grant a permit to drill that provides only the notice required in section 47-316, Idaho Code.
(4) An operator may request a change in the size, shape or location of a drilling unit under this section, as provided in section 47-318(6), Idaho Code. Request may be made for drilling units that are:

An operator may request a change in the size, shape or location of a drilling unit under this section, as provided in section 47-318(6), Idaho Code. Request may be made for drilling units that are:

Larger or smaller than forty (40) acres for oil;

Larger or smaller than one hundred sixty (160) acres for gas; or

Not located within the boundaries of a governmental section, quarter section or quarter-quarter section.

Changes to drilling units may be authorized upon application, notice and an opportunity for hearing as provided in section 47-328, Idaho Code. To authorize a change, the department shall find that such change would assist in preventing the waste of oil and gas, avoid drilling of unnecessary wells, or protect correlative rights. In addition to any other notice required by statute or rule, an operator shall provide proper notice and a copy of the application to all uncommitted owners within the proposed unit and to all other parties an operator reasonably believes may be affected. In establishing drilling units under this section, the department shall review the drilling unit’s size, shape and location based on the application, any supporting exhibits, and evidence introduced at a hearing.